Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.140

Introducing contraband in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of introducing contraband in the first degree if he or she knowingly provides any deadly weapon to any person confined in a detention facility or secure facility under chapter 71.09 RCW.

(2) Introducing contraband in the first degree is a class B felony.

[ 2013 c 43 s 3; 2011 c 336 s 404; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.140.]